California, session 20252026, AB1028.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 87665 of the Education Code is amended to read:87665. (a) Consistent with subdivision (b), the governing board of a community college district may terminate the employment of a temporary employee at its discretion at the end of a day or week, whichever is appropriate. The decision to terminate the employment is not subject to judicial review except as to the time of termination.(b) If the governing board of a community college district terminates the employment of a temporary employee pursuant to subdivision (a), the procedure for terminating the temporary employee shall comply with the provisions of the local collective bargaining agreement that pertain to the termination of a temporary employee.(c) In all cases, part-time faculty assignments shall be temporary in nature, contingent on enrollment and funding, and subject to program changes, and no part-time faculty member shall have reasonable assurance of continued employment at any point, irrespective of the status, length of service, or reemployment preference of that part-time, temporary faculty member.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.